California statutes. Public Contract Code
 subcontractor is ineligible to work on a public works project pursuant to Section 1777.1 or 1777.7 of the Labor Code.

(9) When the awarding authority determines that a listed subcontractor is not a responsible contractor.

Prior to approval of the prime contractor’s request for the substitution, the awarding authority, or its duly authorized officer, shall give notice in writing to the listed subcontractor of the prime contractor’s request to substitute and of the reasons for the request. The notice shall be served by certified or registered mail to the last known address of the subcontractor. The listed subcontractor who has been so notified has five working days within which to submit written objections to the substitution to the awarding authority. Failure to file these written objections constitutes the listed subcontractor’s consent to the substitution.

If
 written objections are filed, the awarding authority shall give notice in writing of at least five working days to the listed subcontractor of a hearing by the awarding authority on the prime contractor’s request for substitution.

(b) Permit a subcontract to be voluntarily assigned or transferred or allow it to be performed by anyone other than the original subcontractor listed in the original bid, without the consent of the awarding authority, or its duly authorized officer.

(c) Other than in the performance of “change orders” causing changes or deviations from the original contract, sublet or subcontract any portion of the work in excess of one-half of 1 percent of the prime contractor’s total bid as to which his or her original bid did not designate a subcontractor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 500, Sec. 58.   (AB 1059)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

4107.2.

No subcontractor listed by a prime contractor under Section 4104 as furnishing and installing carpeting, shall voluntarily sublet his or her subcontract with respect to any portion of the labor to be performed unless he or she specified the subcontractor in his or her bid for that subcontract to the prime contractor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 42.1.)
-------------------------------------------

4107.5.

The prime contractor as a condition to assert a claim of inadvertent clerical error in the listing of a subcontractor shall within two working days after the time of the prime bid opening by the awarding authority give written notice to the awarding authority and copies of that notice to both the subcontractor he or she claims to have listed in error and the intended subcontractor who had bid to the prime contractor prior to bid opening.

Any listed subcontractor who has been notified by the prime contractor in accordance with this section as to an inadvertent clerical error shall be allowed six working days
 from the time of the prime bid opening within which to submit to the awarding authority and to the prime contractor written objection to the prime contractor’s claim of inadvertent clerical error. Failure of the listed subcontractor to file the written notice within the six working days shall be primary evidence of his or her agreement that an inadvertent clerical error was made.

The awarding authority shall, after a public hearing as provided in Section 4107 and in the absence of compelling reasons to the contrary, consent to the substitution of the intended subcontractor:

(a) If (1) the prime contractor, (2) the subcontractor listed in error, and (3) the intended subcontractor each submit an affidavit to the awarding authority along with such additional evidence as the parties may wish to submit that an inadvertent clerical error was in fact made, provided that the affidavits from each of the three
 parties are filed within eight working days from the time of the prime bid opening, or

(b) If the affidavits are filed by both the prime contractor and the intended subcontractor within the specified time but the subcontractor whom the prime contractor claims to have listed in error does not submit within six working days, to the awarding authority and to the prime contractor, written objection to the prime contractor’s claim of inadvertent clerical error as provided in this section.

If the affidavits are filed by both the prime contractor and the intended subcontractor but the listed subcontractor has, within six working days from the time of the prime bid opening, submitted to the awarding authority and to the prime contractor written objection to the prime contractor’s claim of inadvertent clerical error, the awarding authority shall investigate the claims of the parties and shall hold a public
 hearing as provided in Section 4107 to determine the validity of those claims. Any determination made shall be based on the facts contained in the declarations submitted under penalty of perjury by all three parties and supported by testimony under oath and subject to cross-examination. The awarding authority may, on its own motion or that of any other party, admit testimony of other contractors, any bid registries or depositories, or any other party in possession of facts which may have a bearing on the decision of the awarding authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 42.1.)
-------------------------------------------

4107.7.

If a contractor who enters into a contract with a public entity for investigation,
 removal or remedial action, or disposal relative to the release or presence of a hazardous material or hazardous waste fails to pay a subcontractor registered as a hazardous waste hauler pursuant to Section 25163 of the Health and Safety Code within 10 days after the investigation, removal or remedial action, or disposal is completed, the subcontractor may serve a stop notice upon the public entity in accordance with Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 9350) of Title 3 of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 43.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------

4108.

(a) It shall be the responsibility of each subcontractor submitting bids to a prime contractor to be prepared to submit a faithful performance and payment bond or bonds if so requested by the prime contractor. 

(b) In the event any subcontractor submitting a bid to a prime contractor does not, upon the request of the prime contractor and at the expense of the prime contractor at the established charge or premium therefor, furnish to the prime contractor a bond or bonds issued by an admitted surety wherein the prime contractor shall be named the obligee, guaranteeing
 prompt and faithful performance of the subcontract and the payment of all claims for labor and materials furnished or used in and about the work to be done and performed under the subcontract, the prime contractor may reject the bid and make a substitution of another subcontractor subject to Section 4107. 

(c) (1) The bond or bonds may be required under this section only if the prime contractor in his or her written or published request for subbids clearly specifies the amount and requirements of the bond or bonds.

(2) If the expense of the bond or bonds required under this section is to be borne by the subcontractor, that requirement shall also be specified in the prime contractor’s written or published request for subbids. 

(3) The prime contractor’s failure to specify bond requirements, in
 accordance with this subdivision, in the written or published request for subbids shall preclude the prime contractor from imposing bond requirements under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 754, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

4109.

Subletting or subcontracting of any portion of the work in excess of one-half of 1 percent of the prime contractor’s total bid as to which no subcontractor was designated in the original bid shall only be permitted in cases of public emergency or necessity, and then only after a finding reduced to writing as a public record of the awarding authority setting forth the facts constituting the emergency or necessity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 42.1.)
-------------------------------------------

4110.

A prime contractor violating any of the provisions of this chapter violates his or her contract and the awarding authority may exercise the option, in its own discretion, of (1) canceling his or her contract or (2) assessing the prime contractor a penalty in an amount of not more than 10 percent of the amount of the subcontract involved, and this penalty shall be deposited in the fund out of which the prime contract is awarded. In any proceedings under this section the prime contractor shall be entitled to a public hearing and to five days’ notice of the time and place thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 42.1.)
-------------------------------------------

4111.

Violation of this chapter by a licensee under Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code constitutes grounds for disciplinary action by the Contractors State License Board, in addition to the penalties prescribed in Section 4110.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 42.1.)
-------------------------------------------

4112.

The failure on the part of a contractor to comply with any provision of this chapter does not constitute a defense to the contractor in any action brought against the contractor by a subcontractor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 42.1.)
-------------------------------------------

4113.

As used in this chapter, the word “subcontractor” shall mean a contractor, within the meaning of the provisions of Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, who contracts directly with the prime contractor.

“Prime contractor” shall mean the contractor who contracts directly with the awarding authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 42.1.)
-------------------------------------------

4114.

The county board of supervisors, when it is the awarding authority, may delegate its functions under Sections 4107 and 4110 to any officer designated by the board.

The authorized officer shall make a written recommendation to the board of supervisors. The board of supervisors may adopt the recommendation without further notice or hearing, or may set the matter for a de novo hearing before the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 43, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Relief of Bidders [5100. - 5110.]

5100.

(a) “Public entity” means the state, Regents of the University of California, a county, city and county, city, district, public authority, public agency, and any other political subdivision or public corporation in the state.

(b) “Bid” means any proposal submitted to a public entity in competitive bidding for the construction, alteration, repair, or improvement of any structure, building, road or other improvement of any kind.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 435, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5101.

(a) A bidder shall not be relieved of the bid unless by consent of the awarding authority nor shall any change be made in the bid because of mistake, but the bidder may bring an action against the public entity in a court of competent jurisdiction in the county in which the bids were opened for the recovery of the amount forfeited, without interest or costs. If the plaintiff fails to recover judgment, the plaintiff shall pay all costs incurred by the public entity in the suit, including a reasonable attorney’s fee to be fixed by the
 court.

(b) If an awarding authority for the state consents to relieve a bidder of a bid because of mistake, the authority shall prepare a report in writing to document the facts establishing the existence of each element required by Section 5103. The report shall be available for inspection as a public record. In the case of the University of California or a California State University, the report shall be filed with the regents and the trustees, respectively, and shall be available as a public record.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 726, Sec. 21.   Effective September 22, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5102.

The complaint shall be filed, and summons served on the director of the department or the chief of the division or other head of the public entity under which the work is to be performed or an appearance made, within 90 days after the opening of the bid; otherwise, the action shall be dismissed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 435, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5103.

The bidder shall establish to the satisfaction of the court that:

(a) A mistake was made.

(b) He or she gave the public entity written notice within five working days, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and state holidays, after the opening of the bids of the mistake, specifying in the notice in detail how the mistake occurred.

(c) The mistake made the bid materially different
 than he or she intended it to be.

(d) The mistake was made in filling out the bid and not due to error in judgment or to carelessness in inspecting the site of the work, or in reading the plans or specifications.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 270, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

5104.

Other than the notice to the public entity, no claim is required to be filed before bringing the action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 435, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5105.

A bidder who claims a mistake or who forfeits his or her bid security shall be prohibited from participating in further bidding on the project on which the mistake was claimed or security forfeited.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 435, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5106.

If the public entity deems it is for its best interest, it may, on refusal or failure of the successful bidder to execute the contract, award it to the second lowest bidder.

If the second lowest bidder fails or refuses to execute the contract, the public entity may likewise award it to the third lowest bidder.

On the failure or refusal of the second or third lowest bidder to whom a contract is so awarded to execute it, his or her bidder’s security shall be likewise forfeited.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 435, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5107.

In all actions brought under the provisions of this chapter, all courts wherein such actions are or may hereafter be pending, shall give such actions preference over all other civil actions therein, in the matter of setting the same for hearing or trial, and in hearing the same, to the end that all such actions shall be quickly heard and determined.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 435, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5110.

(a) When a project for the construction, alteration, repair, or improvement of any structure, building, or road, or other improvement of any kind is competitively bid and any intended or actual award of the contract is challenged, the contract may be entered into pending final decision of the challenge, subject to the requirements of this section. If the contract is later determined to be invalid due to a defect or defects in the competitive bidding process caused solely by the public entity, the contractor who entered into the contract with
 the public entity shall be entitled to be paid the reasonable cost, specifically excluding profit, of the labor, equipment, materials, and services furnished by the contractor prior to the date of the determination that the contract is invalid if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The contractor proceeded with construction, alteration, repair, or improvement based upon a good faith belief that the contract was valid.

(2) The public entity has reasonably determined that the work performed is satisfactory.

(3) Contractor fraud did not occur in the obtaining or performance of the contract.

(4) The contract does not otherwise violate statutory or constitutional limitations.

(b) In no
 event shall payment to the contractor pursuant to this section exceed either of the following:

(1) The contractor’s costs as included in its bid plus the cost of any approved change orders.

(2) The amount of the contract less profit at the point in time the contract is determined to be invalid.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), this section shall not affect any protest and legal proceedings, whether contractual, administrative, or judicial, to challenge the award of the public works contract and enforce competitive bidding laws, nor affect any rights under Section 337.1 or 337.15 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 678, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Awarding of Contracts [6100. - 6615.]

6100.

(a) A state agency, as defined in Section 10335.7 that is subject to this code, shall, prior to awarding a contract for work to be performed by a contractor, as defined by Section 7026 of the Business and Professions Code, verify with the Contractors State License Board that the person seeking the contract is licensed in a classification appropriate to the work to be undertaken. Verification as required by this section need only be made once every two years with respect to the same contractor.

(b) In lieu of the verification, the state entity may require the person seeking the contract to present his or her pocket license or certificate of licensure and provide a signed statement
 which swears, under penalty of perjury, that the pocket license or certificate of licensure presented is his or hers, is current and valid, and is in a classification appropriate to the work to be undertaken.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 419.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

6101.

(a) A state agency, as defined in Section 10335.7, that is subject to this code, shall not award a public works or purchase contract to a bidder or contractor, nor shall a bidder or contractor be eligible to bid for or receive a public works or purchase contract, who has, in the preceding five years, been convicted of violating a state or federal law respecting the employment of undocumented immigrants.

(b) For purposes of this section, “immigrant” means a person who is not a citizen or national of the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 296, Sec. 55.   (AB 1096)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

6102.

(a) A contract that was entered into because of an act that would constitute a violation of a state or federal crime relating to bribery of a public official, including, but not limited to, a violation of Section 68 or 86 of the Penal Code is voidable.

(b) This section applies to contracts executed on or after
 January 1, 2023, including contracts negotiated prior to January 1, 2023.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 297, Sec. 1.   (SB 34)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

6106.

(a) Any state agency or department, which is subject to this code, shall follow this section in negotiating fees and executing a contract for professional consulting services of a private architectural, engineering, land surveying, environmental, or construction project management firm.

(b) After providing notification to the successful firm of its selection, the state shall provide written instructions for the negotiations which are to follow. These instructions shall provide the private consulting firm with necessary information which shall allow the negotiations to
 proceed in an orderly fashion. Negotiations shall begin within 14 days after the successful firm has been notified of its selection or upon receipt of the cost proposal. The contractor should be notified if additional time is necessary to begin negotiations.

(c) Upon the completion of negotiations, the state and the private firm shall proceed to execute a contract so that the contract may be completed by the state within 45 days. The contractor should be notified if additional time is necessary to complete the contract. The state and private firm shall work together to ensure the successful delivery of the requested services in a timely fashion. 

(d) In the event that an impasse is reached in negotiations, the state agency or department may terminate negotiations and enter into negotiations with the next most qualified firm as prescribed in Section 4528 of the Government
 Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1128, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6106.5.

(a) “State agency,” as used in this section, means those departments defined in Section 10106 of the Public Contract Code.

(b) “Contractor,” as used in this section, means “firm,” “architectural, landscape architectural, engineering, environmental, and land surveying services,” “construction project management,” and “environmental services” as defined in Section 4525 of the Government Code.

(c) State agencies
 shall include a provision in solicitations and in contracts, if the estimated amount to be retained exceeds ten thousand dollars ($10,000), and the retention continues for a period of 60 days beyond the completion of phased services, to permit, upon written request and the expense of the contractor, the payment of retentions earned directly to a state- or federally chartered bank in this state, as the escrow agent. The contractor may direct the investment of the payments into securities, pursuant to subdivision (d), and the contractor shall receive the interest earned on the investments. Upon satisfactory completion of the contract, the contractor shall receive from the escrow agent all securities, interest, and payments received by the escrow agent from the owner, pursuant to the terms of this section. State agencies, relative to contracts entered into prior to the enactment of this section, upon written request of the contractor, and subject to the approval of the state agency, may utilize the provisions
 of this section.

(d) Securities eligible for investment under this section shall include those listed in Section 16430 of the Government Code, interest-bearing demand deposit accounts, or any other investment mutually agreed to by the contractor and the state agency.

(e) (1) Any contractor who elects to receive interest on moneys withheld in retention by a state agency shall, at the request of any subcontractor, make that option available to the subcontractor regarding any moneys withheld in retention by the contractor from the subcontractor. If the contractor elects to receive interest on any moneys withheld in retention by a state agency, then the subcontractor shall receive the identical rate of interest received by the contractor on any retention moneys withheld from the subcontractor by the contractor, less any actual pro rata costs associated with
 administering and calculating that interest. In the event that the interest rate is a fluctuating rate, the rate for the subcontractor shall be determined by calculating the interest rate paid during the time that retentions were withheld from the subcontractor. If the contractor elects to substitute securities in lieu of retention, then, by mutual consent of the contractor and subcontractor, the subcontractor may substitute securities in exchange for the release of moneys held in retention by the contractor.

(2) This subdivision shall apply only to those subcontractors performing more than 5 percent of the contractor’s total fee.

(3) No contractor shall require any subcontractor to waive any provision of this section.

(f) An escrow agreement used pursuant to this section shall be null, void, and unenforceable unless
 it is substantially similar to the following form:ESCROW AGREEMENT FOR SECURITY DEPOSITSThis Escrow Agreement is made and entered into by and betweenwhose address ishereinafter called “owner,”whose address ishereinafter called “contractor,” andwhose address ishereinafter called “escrow agent.”(1) Pursuant to Section 6106.5 of the Public Contract Code of the State of California, upon written request of the contractor, the owner shall make payments of retention earnings required to be withheld by the owner pursuant to the professional consulting services agreement entered into between the owner and contractor for ____ in the amount of ____ dated ____ hereafter referred to as the “contract.”

(2) When the owner makes payment of retentions earned directly to the escrow agent, the escrow agent shall hold them for the benefit of the contractor until such time as the escrow created under this contract is terminated. The contractor may direct the investment of the
 payments into securities pursuant to Section 6106.5(d) of the Public Contract Code. All terms and conditions of this agreement and the rights and responsibilities of the parties shall be equally applicable and binding when the owner pays the escrow agent directly.

(3) The contractor shall be responsible for paying all fees for the expenses incurred by the escrow agent in administering the escrow account. These expenses and payment terms shall be determined by the contractor and escrow agent.

(4) The contractor shall have the right to withdraw all or any part of the principal or interest in the escrow account only by written notice to the escrow agent accompanied by written authorization from the owner to the escrow agent that the owner consents to the withdrawal of the amount sought to be withdrawn by contractor.

(5) The owner shall have a right to draw upon the escrow account in the event of default by the contractor. Upon seven days’ written notice to the escrow agent from the owner of the default, the escrow agent shall immediately distribute the cash as instructed by the owner.

(6) Upon receipt of written notification from the owner certifying that the contract is final and complete, and that the contractor has complied with all requirements and procedures applicable to the contract, the escrow agent shall release to the contractor all deposits and interest on deposits less escrow fees and charges of the escrow account. The escrow shall be closed immediately upon disbursement of all moneys on deposit and payments of fees and charges.

(7) The escrow agent shall rely on the written notifications from the owner and the contractor pursuant to Sections (1) to (6), inclusive, of
 this agreement and the owner and contractor shall hold the escrow agent harmless from the escrow agent’s release, conversion, and disbursement of the securities and interest as set forth above.

(8) The names of the persons who are authorized to give written notice or to receive written notice on behalf of the owner and on behalf of the contractor in connection with the foregoing, and exemplars of their respective signatures are as follows:On behalf of the owner:
On behalf of the contractor:
Title
Title
Name
Name
Address
Address
On behalf of the escrow agent:
Title
Name
Signature
Address
At the time the escrow account is opened, the owner and contractor shall deliver to the escrow agent a fully executed counterpart of this Agreement.

IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties have executed this Agreement by their proper officers on the date first set forth above.Owner
Contractor
Title
Title
Name
Name
Signature
Signature

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 22, Sec. 154.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

6107.

(a) As used in this section, “California company” means a sole proprietorship, partnership, joint venture, corporation, or other business entity that was a licensed California contractor on the date when bids for the public contract were opened and meets one of the following:

(1) Has its principal place of business in California.

(2) Has its principal place of business in a state in which there is no local
 contractor preference on construction contracts.

(3) Has its principal place of business in a state in which there is a local contractor construction preference and the contractor has paid not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) in sales or use taxes to California for construction related activity for each of the five years immediately preceding the submission of the bid.

(b) (1) When awarding contracts for construction, a state agency shall grant a California company a reciprocal preference as against a nonresident contractor from any state that gives or requires a preference to be given contractors from that state on its public entity construction contracts.

(2) The amount of the reciprocal preference shall be equal to the amount of the preference applied by the state of the nonresident
 contractor with the lowest responsive bid, except where the resident contractor is eligible for a California small business preference, in which case the preference applied shall be the greater of the two, but not both.

(3) If the contractor submitting the lowest responsive bid is not a California company and has its principal place of business in any state that gives or requires the giving of a preference on its public entity construction contracts to contractors from that state, and if a California company has also submitted a responsive bid, and, with the benefit of the reciprocal preference, the California company’s bid is equal to or less than the original lowest responsive bid, the public entity shall award the contract to the California company at its submitted bid price.

(c) (1) The bidder shall certify, under penalty of perjury, that the bidder
 qualifies as a California company.

(2) A nonresident contractor shall, at the time of bidding, disclose to the awarding agency any and all bid preferences provided to the nonresident contractor by the state or country in which the nonresident contractor has its principal place of business.

(d) The reciprocal preference is waived if the certification described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) does not appear on the bid.

(e) This section does not apply if application of this section might jeopardize the receipt of federal funds or the nonresident contractor certifies, under penalty of perjury, in its bid that its state of residency does not give a preference for contractors from that state on its public entity construction contracts.

(f) “Construction
 related activity” shall include, without limitation, any activity for which a California contractors’ license is required.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 279, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

6108.

(a) (1) Every contract entered into by any state agency for the procurement or laundering of apparel, garments, or corresponding accessories, or the procurement of equipment, materials, or supplies, other than procurement related to a public works contract, shall require that a contractor certify that no apparel, garments, corresponding accessories, equipment, materials, or supplies furnished to the state pursuant to the contract have been laundered or produced in whole or in part by sweatshop labor, forced labor, convict labor, indentured labor under penal sanction, abusive forms of child labor, or exploitation of children in sweatshop labor, or with the benefit of sweatshop labor, forced labor, convict labor, indentured
 labor under penal sanction, abusive forms of child labor, or exploitation of children in sweatshop labor. The contractor shall agree to comply with this provision of the contract.

(2) The contract shall specify that the contractor is required to cooperate fully in providing reasonable access to the contractor’s records, documents, agents, employees, or premises if reasonably required by authorized officials of the contracting agency, the Department of Industrial Relations, or the Department of Justice determine the contractor’s compliance with the requirements under paragraph (1).

(b) (1) Any contractor contracting with the state who knew or should have known that the apparel, garments, corresponding accessories, equipment, materials, or supplies
 furnished to the state were laundered or produced in violation of the conditions specified in subdivision (a) when entering into a contract pursuant to subdivision (a), may, subject to subdivision (c), have any or all of the following sanctions imposed:

(A) The contract under which the prohibited apparel, garments, or corresponding accessories, equipment, materials, or supplies were laundered or provided may be voided at the option of the state agency to which the equipment, materials, or supplies were provided.

(B) The contractor may be assessed a penalty that shall be the greater of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or an amount equaling 20 percent of the value of the apparel, garments, corresponding accessories, equipment, materials, or supplies that the state agency demonstrates
 were produced in violation of the conditions specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) and that were supplied to the state agency under the contract.

(C) The contractor may be removed from the bidder’s list for a period not to exceed 360 days.

(2) Any moneys collected pursuant to this subdivision shall be deposited into the General Fund.

(c) (1) When imposing the sanctions described in subdivision (b), the contracting agency shall notify the contractor of the right to a hearing, if requested, within 15 days of the date of the notice. The hearing shall be before an administrative law judge of the Office of Administrative Hearings in accordance with the procedures specified in Chapter 5 (commencing
 with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The administrative law judge shall take into consideration any measures the contractor has taken to ensure compliance with this section, and may waive any or all of the sanctions if it is determined that the contractor has acted in good faith.

(2) The agency shall be assessed the cost of the administrative hearing, unless the agency has prevailed in the hearing, in which case the contractor shall be assessed the cost of the hearing.

(d) (1) Any state agency that investigates a complaint against a contractor for violation of this section may limit its investigation to evaluating the information provided by the person or entity submitting the complaint and the information provided by the contractor.

(2) Whenever a contracting officer of the contracting agency has reason to believe that the contractor failed to comply with paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), the agency shall refer the matter for investigation to the head of the agency and, as the head of the agency determines appropriate, to either the Director of Industrial Relations or the Department of Justice.

(e) (1) For purposes of this section, “forced labor” shall have the same meaning as in Section 1307 of Title 19 of the United States Code.

(2) “Abusive forms of child labor” means any of the following:

(A) All forms of slavery or practices similar to slavery, such as the sale
 and trafficking of children, debt bondage, and serfdom and forced or compulsory labor, including forced or compulsory recruitment of children for use in armed conflict.

(B) The use, procuring, or offering of a child for prostitution, for the production of pornography, or for pornographic performances.

(C) The use, procuring, or offering of a child for illicit activities, in particular for the production and trafficking of illicit drugs.

(D) All work or service exacted from or performed by any person under the age of 18 years either under the menace of any penalty for its nonperformance and for which the worker does not offer oneself voluntarily, or under a contract, the enforcement of which can be accomplished by process
 or penalties.

(E) All work or service exacted from or performed by a child in violation of all applicable laws of the country of manufacture governing the minimum age of employment, compulsory education, and occupational health and safety.

(3) “Exploitation of children in sweatshop labor” means all work or service exacted from or performed by any person under the age of 18 years in violation of more than one law of the country of manufacture governing wage and benefits, occupational health and safety, nondiscrimination, and freedom of association.

(4) “Sweatshop labor” means all work or service exacted from or performed by any person in violation of more than one law of the country of manufacture governing wages, employee
 benefits, occupational health, occupational safety, nondiscrimination, or freedom of association.

(5) “Apparel, garments, or corresponding accessories” includes, but is not limited to, uniforms.

(6) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, “forced labor” and “convict labor” do not include work or services performed by an inmate or a person employed by the
 California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority.

(7) “State agency” means any state agency in this state.

(f) (1) On or before February 1, 2004, the Department of Industrial Relations shall establish a contractor responsibility program, including a Sweatfree Code of Conduct, to be signed by all bidders on state contracts and subcontracts. Any state agency responsible for procurement shall ensure that the Sweatfree Code of Conduct is available for public review at least 30 calendar days between the dates of receipt and the final award of the contract. The Sweatfree Code of Conduct shall list the requirements that contractors are required to meet, as set forth in subdivision (g).

(2) Upon implementation in the manner described in paragraph
 (4), every contract entered into by any state agency for the procurement or laundering of apparel, garments, or corresponding accessories, or for the procurement of equipment or supplies, shall require that the contractor certify in accordance with the Sweatfree Code of Conduct that no apparel, garments, or corresponding accessories, or equipment, materials, or supplies, furnished to the state pursuant to the contract have been laundered or produced, in whole or in part, by sweatshop labor.

(3) The appropriate procurement agency, in consultation with the Director of Industrial Relations, shall employ a phased and targeted approach to implementing the Sweatfree Code of Conduct. Sweatfree Code of Conduct procurement policies involving apparel, garments, and corresponding accessories may be permitted a phasein period of up to
 one year for purposes of feasibility and providing sufficient notice to contractors and the general public. The appropriate procurement agency, in consultation with the Director of Industrial Relations, shall target other procurement categories based on the magnitude of verified sweatshop conditions and the feasibility of implementation, and may set phasein goals and timetables of up to three years to achieve compliance with the principles of the Sweatfree Code of Conduct.

(4) In order to facilitate compliance with the Sweatfree Code of Conduct, the Department of Industrial Relations shall explore mechanisms employed by other governmental entities, including, but not limited to, New Jersey Executive Order No. 20, of 2002, to ensure that businesses that contract with this state are in compliance with this section and any regulations or